California, session 20252026, AB809.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2053.2 is added to the Penal Code, to read:2053.2. (a) On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the department shall collect and report all of the following information to the Legislature:(1) The amount of space available for academic and vocational education.(2) The amount of space currently being used for other purposes that reasonably could be converted to be available for academic and vocational education.(3) The extent to which the space described in paragraph (1) is being used.(4) The amount of the deficit or surplus of space available for academic and vocational education as described in paragraph (1) at each prison.(b) A report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.